Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 1. Criminal Justice Information.

Sec. 12.62.005.
Intent.

It is the intent of the legislature that the department administer the provisions of this chapter in a manner that protects victims of crime, allows the proper administration of justice, and avoids vigilantism.

History.

(§ 1 ch 118 SLA 1994)

Secs. 12.62.010 — 12.62.015.
Regulations; collection and security of information. [Repealed, § 4 ch 118 SLA 1994. For current law, see AS 12.62.110 — 12.62.150.]

Sec. 12.62.017.
Annual report to commission. [Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

Secs. 12.62.020 — 12.62.035.
Collection, storage, access, and use. [Repealed, § 4 ch 118 SLA 1994. For current law, see AS 12.62.160.]

Secs. 12.62.040 — 12.62.070.
Security, updating; interstate exchange of information; remedies; definitions. [Repealed, § 4 ch 118 SLA 1994. For current law, see AS 12.62.170 — 12.62.190.]

Sec. 12.62.100.
Criminal justice information advisory board; functions and duties.

The Criminal Justice Information Advisory Board is established in the department. The board consists of the following members:

a member of the general public appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the governor;

a municipal police chief appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the governor; in making this appointment, the governor shall consult with the Alaska Association of Chiefs of Police;

the attorney general or the attorney general’s designee;

the chief justice of the supreme court or the chief justice’s designee;

the commissioner of administration or the commissioner’s designee;

the commissioner of corrections or the commissioner’s designee;

the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s designee;

the commissioner of public safety or the commissioner’s designee, who will serve as chair of the board; and

the executive director of the Alaska Judicial Council or the executive director’s designee.

Members of the board receive no compensation for services on the board, but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards under AS

39.20.180

.

The board shall meet at least once every six months.

The board shall advise the department and other criminal justice agencies on matters pertaining to the development and operation of the central repository described in AS

12.62.110

(1) and other criminal justice information systems, including providing advice about regulations and procedures, and estimating the resources and costs of those resources, needed to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For reporting information to the repository, see 13 AAC 68, art. 2.

Sec. 12.62.110.
Duties of the commissioner regarding information systems.

The commissioner shall

develop and operate a criminal justice information system to serve as the state’s central repository of criminal history record information, and to collect, store, and release criminal justice information as provided in this chapter;

consult with the board established by AS

12.62.100

regarding matters concerning the operation of the department’s criminal justice information systems;

provide a uniform crime reporting system for the periodic collection, analysis, and reporting of crimes, and compile and publish statistics and other information on the nature and extent of crime in the state;

cooperate with other agencies of the state, the criminal record repositories of other states, the Interstate Identification Index, the National Law Enforcement Telecommunications System, the National Crime Information Center, and other appropriate agencies or systems, in the development and operation of an effective interstate, national, and international system of criminal identification, records, and statistics; and

in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), adopt regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter; in adopting the regulations, the commissioner may consult with affected law enforcement agencies regarding the fiscal implications of the regulations; regulations may not be adopted under this section that affect procedures of the court system.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For scope and purpose of the repository, see 13 AAC 68, art. 1.

For reporting information to the repository, see 13 AAC 68, art. 2.

For completeness, accuracy, and security, see 13 AAC 68, art. 3.

For dissemination of criminal justice information, see 13 AAC 68, art. 4.

For central repository of criminal justice information, see 13 AAC 68, art. 6.

Sec. 12.62.120.
Reporting of criminal justice information.

The commissioner, by regulation and after consultation with the board and affected agencies, may designate which criminal justice agencies are responsible for reporting the events described in (b) of this section. An agency designated under this subsection shall report the events described in (b) of this section to the department, at the time, in the manner, and in the form specified by the department.

An agency designated under (a) of this section shall report the following events to the department if they occur in connection with an arrestable offense:

the issuance, receipt, withdrawal, quashing, or execution of a judicial arrest warrant, a governor’s warrant of arrest for extradition, or a parole arrest warrant;

an arrest, with or without a warrant, or an escape after arrest;

the release of a person after arrest without charges being filed;

the admittance to, release or escape from, or unlawful evasion of, official detention in a correctional facility, either pretrial or post-trial;

a decision by a prosecutor or a grand jury not to commence criminal proceedings, to defer or indefinitely postpone prosecution, or to decline to prosecute charges;

the filing of a charging document, including an indictment, criminal complaint, criminal information, or a petition or other document showing a violation of bail, probation, or parole, or the amendment of a charging document;

an acquittal, dismissal, conviction, or other disposition of charges set out in a charging document described in (6) of this subsection;

the imposition of a sentence or the granting of a suspended imposition of sentence under AS

12.55.085

;

the commencement or expiration of parole or probation supervision and the conditions of that parole or probation supervision;

the commitment to or release from a facility, designated by the Department of Health and Social Services, of a person who was previously accused of a crime but who has been found to be incompetent to stand trial or found not criminally responsible;

the filing of an action in an appellate court or a federal court relating to a conviction or sentence;

a judgment of a court that reverses, remands, vacates, or reinstates a criminal charge, conviction, or sentence;

a pardon, reprieve, executive clemency, commutation of sentence, or other change in the length or terms of a sentence by executive or judicial action;

the release of a person on bail and the conditions of that release; and

any other event required to be reported under regulations adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For reporting information to the repository, see 13 AAC 68, art. 2.

Sec. 12.62.130.
Reporting of uniform crime information.

A criminal justice agency shall submit to the department, at the time, in the manner, and in the form specified by the department, data regarding crimes committed within that agency’s jurisdiction. At a minimum, the department shall require a criminal justice agency to report each felony sex offense committed in the agency’s jurisdiction. The department may withhold grant funding to a criminal justice agency that fails to report data as required by this section. The department shall compile, and provide to the governor and the attorney general, an annual report concerning the number and nature of criminal offenses committed, the disposition of the offenses, and any other data the commissioner finds appropriate relating to the method, frequency, cause, and prevention of crime. In this section, “sex offense” has the meaning given in AS

12.63.100

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1994; am § 17 ch 18 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, added the second, third, and last sentences.

Sec. 12.62.140.
Reporting of information regarding wanted persons and stolen property.

A criminal justice agency shall report to the department, at the time, in the manner, and in the form specified by the department, data regarding

a person the agency is trying to locate, whether that person is wanted in connection with the commission of a crime, and the discovery, if any, of that person;

the theft, and recovery if any, of an identifiable motor vehicle; and

the theft, and recovery if any, of identifiable property.

A criminal justice agency, annually and at other times if requested by the department, shall confirm whether information already reported under (a) of this section continues to be valid, and shall cooperate with the department in periodic audits to validate the information reported.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1994)

Sec. 12.62.150.
Completeness, accuracy, and security of criminal justice information.

A criminal justice agency shall

adopt reasonable procedures to ensure that criminal justice information that the agency maintains is accurate and complete;

notify a criminal justice agency known to have received information of a material nature that is inaccurate or incomplete;

provide adequate procedures and facilities to protect criminal justice information from unauthorized access and from accidental or deliberate damage by theft, sabotage, fire, flood, wind, or power failure;

provide procedures for screening, supervising, and disciplining agency personnel in order to minimize the risk of security violations;

provide training for employees working with or having access to criminal justice information;

if maintaining criminal justice information within an automated information system operated by a noncriminal justice agency, develop or approve system operating procedures to comply with this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter, and monitor the implementation of those procedures to ensure that they are effective; and

maintain, for at least three years, and make available for audit purposes,

records showing the accuracy and completeness of information maintained by the agency in a criminal justice information system; and

records required to be maintained under AS

12.62.160(c)(4)

.

The department shall adopt reasonable procedures designed to ensure that information about arrests and criminal charges that is stored in a criminal justice information system can be linked with information about the disposition of those arrests and charges.

Every two years the department shall undertake an audit, and every four years shall obtain an independent audit, of the department’s criminal justice information system that serves as the central repository and of a sample of other state and local criminal justice information systems, to verify adherence to the requirements of this chapter and other applicable laws. The department shall provide to the board the final report of each audit.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For completeness, accuracy, and security, see 13 AAC 68, art. 3.

For dissemination of criminal justice information, see 13 AAC 68, art. 4.

Sec. 12.62.160.
Release and use of criminal justice information; fees.

Criminal justice information and the identity of recipients of criminal justice information are confidential and exempt from disclosure under AS 40.25. The existence or nonexistence of criminal justice information may not be released to or confirmed to any person except as provided in this section and AS

12.62.180(d)

.

Subject to the requirements of this section, and except as otherwise limited or prohibited by other provision of law or court rule, criminal justice information

may be provided to a person when, and only to the extent, necessary to avoid imminent danger to life or extensive damage to property;

may be provided to a person to the extent required by applicable court rules or under an order of a court of this state, another state, or the United States;

may be provided to a person if the information is commonly or traditionally provided by criminal justice agencies in order to identify, locate, or apprehend fugitives or wanted persons or to recover stolen property, or for public reporting of recent arrests, charges, and other criminal justice activity;

may be provided to a criminal justice agency for a criminal justice activity;

may be provided to a government agency when necessary for enforcement of or for a purpose specifically authorized by state or federal law;

may be provided to a person specifically authorized by a state or federal law to receive that information;

in aggregate form may be released to a qualified person, as determined by the agency, for criminal justice research, subject to written conditions that assure the security of the information and the privacy of individuals to whom the information relates;

may be provided to a person for any purpose, except that information may not be released if the information is nonconviction information or correctional treatment information;

including information relating to a serious offense, may be provided to an interested person if the information is requested for the purpose of determining whether to grant a person supervisory or disciplinary power over a minor or dependent adult; and

may be provided to the person who is the subject of the information.

Unless otherwise provided for in regulations adopted by the commissioner, if access to criminal justice information is permitted under (b) of this section

the information may be released only by the agency maintaining that information;

the information may not be released under this section without first determining that the information is the most current information available within that criminal justice information system, unless the system is incapable of providing the most current information available within the necessary time period;

the information may not be released under this section until the person requesting the information establishes the identity of the subject of the information by fingerprint comparison or another reliable means of identification approved by the department;

the information may not be released under this section unless the criminal justice agency releasing the information records, and maintains for at least three years, the name of the person or agency that is to receive the information, the date the information was released, the nature of the information, and the statutory authority that permits the release; and

information released under this section may be used only for the purpose or activity for which the information was released.

Notwithstanding AS 40.25, a criminal justice agency may charge fees, established by regulation or municipal ordinance, for processing requests for records under this chapter, unless the request is from a criminal justice agency or is required for purposes of discovery in a criminal case. In addition to fees charged under AS

44.41.025

for processing fingerprints through the Alaska automated fingerprint system, the department may charge fees for other services in connection with the processing of information requests, including fees for contacting other jurisdictions to determine the disposition of an out-of-state arrest or to clarify the nature of an out-of-state conviction. The department may also collect and account for fees charged by the Federal Bureau of Investigation for processing fingerprints forwarded to the bureau by the department. The annual estimated balance in the account maintained by the commissioner of administration under AS

37.05.142

may be used by the legislature to make appropriations to the department to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

When an interested person requests information under (b)(9) of this section, the department may also obtain a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

if the person submits the fingerprints and fees required for that check under (d) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 2001; am § 6 ch 79 SLA 2004; am § 12 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS 40.25” was substituted for “AS 09.25” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

.

Administrative Code. —

For sex offender and child kidnapper registration, see 13 AAC 9.

For scope and purpose of the repository, see 13 AAC 68, art. 1.

For completeness, accuracy, and security, see 13 AAC 68, art. 3.

For dissemination of criminal justice information, see 13 AAC 68, art. 4.

For central repository of criminal justice information, see 13 AAC 68, art. 6.

Sec. 12.62.170.
Correction of criminal justice information.

A criminal justice agency shall correct, modify, or add an explanatory notation to criminal history records that the agency is responsible for maintaining if the revision is necessary to achieve accuracy or completeness.

A person may submit a written request to the head of the agency responsible for maintaining criminal justice information asking the agency to correct, modify, or add any information or explanatory notation to criminal justice information about the person that the person believes is inaccurate or incomplete. The decision of the head of the agency is the final administrative decision on the request.

The person requesting revision of criminal justice information may appeal an adverse decision of the agency to the court under applicable rules of procedure for appealing the decision of an administrative agency. The appellant bears the burden on appeal of showing that the agency decision was in error. An appeal filed under this subsection may not collaterally attack a court judgment or a decision by prison, probation, or parole authorities, or any other action that is or could have been subject to appeal, post-conviction relief, or other administrative remedy.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For completeness, accuracy, and security, see 13 AAC 68, art. 3.

Sec. 12.62.180.
Sealing of criminal justice information.

Under this section, a criminal justice agency may seal only the information that the agency is responsible for maintaining.

A person may submit a written request to the head of the agency responsible for maintaining past conviction or current offender information, asking the agency to seal such information about the person that, beyond a reasonable doubt, resulted from mistaken identity or false accusation. The decision of the head of the agency is the final administrative decision on the request.

The person requesting that the information be sealed may appeal an adverse decision of the agency to the court under applicable rules of procedure for appealing the decision of an administrative agency. The appellant bears the burden on appeal of showing that the agency decision was clearly mistaken. An appeal filed under this subsection may not collaterally attack a court judgment or a decision by prison, probation, or parole authorities, or any other action that is or could have been subject to appeal, post-conviction relief, or other administrative remedy.

A person about whom information is sealed under this section may deny the existence of the information and of an arrest, charge, conviction, or sentence shown in the information. Information that is sealed under this section may be provided to another person or agency only

for record management purposes, including auditing;

for criminal justice employment purposes;

for review by the subject of the record;

for research and statistical purposes;

when necessary to prevent imminent harm to a person; or

for a use authorized by statute or court order.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For completeness, accuracy, and security, see 13 AAC 68, art. 3.

For dissemination of criminal justice information, see 13 AAC 68, art. 4.

Sec. 12.62.190.
Purging of criminal justice information.

A criminal justice agency may purge only the criminal justice information that the agency is responsible for maintaining. An agency may determine when and what information will be purged, under (b) of this section.

Criminal justice information may be purged if the agency determines that the information is devoid of usefulness to a criminal justice agency due to the

death of the subject of the information;

age of the information;

nature of the offense or of the information;

volume of the agency’s records or other record management considerations.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For completeness, accuracy, and security, see 13 AAC 68, art. 3.

Sec. 12.62.200.
Civil action and defense.

Failure to comply with a requirement of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter is not a basis for civil liability, but may be the basis for employee discipline or administrative action to restrict a person’s or agency’s access to information. However, a person whose criminal justice information has been released or used in knowing violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter may bring an action for damages in the superior court.

It is a defense to a civil or criminal action based on a violation of this chapter, or regulations adopted under this chapter, if a person relied in good faith upon the provisions of this chapter or of other laws or regulations governing maintenance, release, or use of criminal justice information, or upon policies or procedures established by a criminal justice agency.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For completeness, accuracy, and security, see 13 AAC 68, art. 3.

For dissemination of criminal justice information, see 13 AAC 68, art. 4.